Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 15 Administrative Procedures
25-15-102. Interpreters between a hearing individual and an individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf.

For the purpose of appointing an interpreter between a hearing individual and an individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf under §25-15-101:

(1)An interpreter shall not be appointed unless the appointing authority and the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf makes a preliminary determination that the interpreter is able to readily communicate with the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf and is able to accurately interpret the statements of the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf and interpret the proceedings in which an individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf may be involved.

An individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf entitled to an interpreter under §25-15-101 is entitled to an interpreter as defined by this subsection.

(1)An oral interpreter shall be provided upon the request of an individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf who does not communicate in sign language.

(A)The right of an individual who is oral deaf to an interpreter may not be waived except by an individual who is oral deaf who does not use sign language and who initiates the request for a waiver in writing.

(A)If an individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf reasonably expects the need for an interpreter to be for a period greater than a single day, the individual who is deaf, deafblind, hard of hearing, or oral deaf shall notify the appointing authority.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 664, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-715.1, 5-715.2; Acts 1991, No. 469, § 3; 2013, No. 1314, § 4.

25-15-103. Stay of proceedings in which party or attorney is a member or an employee of either branch of the General Assembly.

The motion for a continuance need not be reduced to writing.

It is not necessary that notice be afforded to opposing counsel that a continuance is sought.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 312, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 27-1401.1; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 43.

25-15-104. Subpoena powers.

(1)A witness who has been served by subpoena in the manner provided by law and who appears in person to testify at the trial or cause pending before the board or commission shall be paid or tendered the legal fees for travel and attendance as provided by law.

In the event a witness has been served with subpoenas under this section and fails to provide testimony in obedience to the subpoena, the board or commission may apply to the circuit court of the county wherein the board or commission is having its meeting for an order causing the arrest of the witness and directing that the witness be brought before the court.

The court shall have the power to punish the disobedient witness for contempt as provided by the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

A witness who is served with a subpoena under this section may challenge the validity of the subpoena in the circuit court of the county where the board or commission is having its meeting or the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

This section is intended to be supplemental and add the power to issue subpoenas to the various chapters of the Code that do not now provide the power to do so. This section shall not repeal any law or part of laws now in existence.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1286, § 1; 1995, No. 757, § 1; 1999, No. 1122, § 7; 2001, No. 617, § 22; 2009, No. 83, § 1; 2009, No. 1182, §
1; 2011, No. 1122, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 497, § 24; 2017, No. 788, § 92.

25-15-105. Administrative fees and penalties.

As used in this section, “agency” means the same as defined at §25-15-202.

(1)An agency shall not assess a fee or penalty without specific statutory authority to:

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1159, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Administrative Procedure Act

25-15-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and cited as the “Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act”.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-714.

25-15-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Adjudication” means an agency process for the formulation of an order.

“Adjudication” does not include inmate disciplinary proceedings conducted by the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction;

“Agency” means a board, commission, department, officer, or other authority of the government of the State of Arkansas, whether within, or subject to review by, another agency, except the General Assembly, the courts, and the Governor.

The word “agency” shall include the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education and the Child Care Appeal Review Panel for purposes of administrative appeal.

Except as provided in subdivision (2)(C)(ii) of this section, the word “agency” shall not include the Arkansas Public Service Commission, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the Workers' Compensation Commission, and the Division of Workforce Services, as the existing laws governing those agencies provide adequate administrative procedures for those agencies.

The word “agency” as used in §§25-15-216 and 25-15-218 shall include the Arkansas Public Service Commission, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the Workers' Compensation Commission, and the Division of Workforce Services.

This subchapter does not repeal delegations of authority as provided by law;

“Financial impact statement” means a realistic statement of a new or increased cost or obligation of complying with a proposed rule to a:

Private individual, entity, and business; and

State, county, and municipal government;

“License” includes an agency permit, certificate, approval, registration, charter, or similar form of permission required by law;

“Licensing” means an agency process respecting the grant, denial, renewal, revocation, suspension, annulment, withdrawal, limitation, or amendment of a license;

“Order” means the final disposition of an agency in any matter other than rulemaking, including licensing and rate making, in which the agency is required by law to make its determination after notice and hearing;

“Party” means a person or agency named or admitted as a party, or properly seeking and entitled as of right to be admitted as a party, in an agency proceeding;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or public or private organization of any character;

“Rule” means an agency statement of general applicability and future effect that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy, or describes the organization, procedure, or practice of an agency and includes, but is not limited to, the amendment or repeal of a prior rule.

“Rule” does not mean:

A statement that concerns the internal management of a state agency and that does not affect the private rights or procedures available to the public;

A declaratory order or ruling issued under § 25-15-206 or other provision of law applicable to the state agency issuing the declaratory order or ruling;

Intra-agency memoranda; or

A medical code within the Arkansas Medicaid Program that is issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including without limitation:

Current Procedural Terminology codes;

Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System codes;

International Classification of Diseases codes;

National Uniform Billing Committee Official UB-04 Specifications Manual codes; and

National Correct Coding Initiative codes; and

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted (3), redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly, and made stylistic changes to the section.

The 2017 amendment, in (9)(B)(i), substituted “A statement that concerns” for “Statements concerning”, “a state agency” for “an agency” and “does not” for “do not”; in (9)(B)(ii), substituted “A declaratory order or ruling issued under” for “Declaratory rulings issued pursuant to” and added “or other provision of law applicable to the state agency issuing the declaratory order or ruling”; added (9)(B)(iv); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 517 redesignated former (2)(C) as (2)(C)(i); added “Except as provided in subdivision (2)(C)(ii) of this section”,in (2)(C)(i); and added (2)(C)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 662 redesignated (2)(C) as (2)(C)(i); added “Except as provided in subdivision (2)(C)(ii) of this section” in (2)(C)(i); and added (2)(C)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910,in (1)(B), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”; and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (2)(C).

Ark. L. Notes.

Looney, Handling Administrative Proceedings Before the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Department and Commission, 1988 Ark. L. Notes 23.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, State Government, Administrative Procedures Act, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 493.

Annual Survey of Caselaw, Administrative Law, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 791.

State employee's appeal from her termination by a state school for the deaf could not be heard due to lack of jurisdiction because there was no judicial review of such termination decisions absent a public policy exception; such decisions were legislative rather than adjudicatory. The school's alleged violation of its non-mandatory reduction policy did not rise to the level of a public policy violation.Tripcony v. Ark. Sch. for the Deaf, 2012 Ark. 188, 403 S.W.3d 559 (2012).

Inmate's petition failed to sustain a claim under §25-15-212 to support a judicial review of the Arkansas Department of Corrections'decision because it did not set forth facts to show deprivation of a liberty interest under the Due Process Clause; the inmate alleged only a breach of contractual terms and that the DOC rules interfered with his right to correspond or otherwise communicate with persons not in prison.Renfro v. Smith, 2013 Ark. 40 (2013).

Circuit court had no subject-matter jurisdiction to review the licensing decision of the Medical Marijuana Commission (MMC) concerning cultivation facilities because (1) under §25-15-212, no “adjudication” as defined by statute occurred at the agency level and the MMC's decision was not quasi-judicial, and (2) under §25-15-207, the court only had jurisdiction to resolve a rule's validity or applicability, but the invalidity of a MMC rule was not pled, the “applicability” of a rule was not contested, and no declaration of whether a rule should have been applied was sought; instead, the complaints sought a declaration that the “application” of the MMC rules was improper, unfair, and arbitrary.Ark. Dep't of Fin. & Admin. v. Naturalis Health, LLC, 2018 Ark. 224, 549 S.W.3d 901 (2018).

Since local school districts are political subdivisions of the state and not state agencies within the meaning of the act, this subchapter does not apply to local school districts. Corbin v. Special Sch. Dist., 250 Ark. 357, 465 S.W.2d 342 (1971).

The Employment Security Division of the Arkansas Department of Labor is specifically exempted but neither the Department of Labor nor the Commissioner (now Director) of Labor are exempt from provisions of this subchapter relating to the procedure for the adoption of rules. Arkansas Dep't of Labor v. American Emp. Agency, 257 Ark. 509, 517 S.W.2d 949 (1975).

The Alcoholic Beverage Commission is not an agency excepted from this subchapter and is therefore subject to its provisions. Byrd v. Jones, 263 Ark. 406, 565 S.W.2d 131 (1978).

The Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act does not apply to the Supreme Court Committee on Professional Conduct; courts are specifically excluded from the definition of “agency,” and the Committee on Professional Conduct is an arm of the Supreme Court. Supreme Court Comm. on Professional Conduct v. Muhammed, 291 Ark. 225, 723 S.W.2d 828 (1987).

Arkansas Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) is an agency under §25-15-202(2)(A); therefore, a decision from the DHHS to leave a person's name on the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Central Registry was reviewed under the standards in §25-15-212(h)(1), (4).Vancleave v. Ark. Dep't of Health & Human Servs., 98 Ark. App. 299, 254 S.W.3d 770 (2007).

Words “delegation of authority” do not refer to jurisdiction placed in a court. Ark. Sav. & Loan Ass'n Bd. v. Corning Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 252 Ark. 264, 478 S.W.2d 431 (1972).

Site selection for the construction of an adult detention facility does not fall anywhere within the definition of the term “rule” as contained in this section, as it does not constitute an agency statement of general applicability. Eldridge v. Board of Corr., 298 Ark. 467, 768 S.W.2d 534 (1989).

Recommendations by a state board as to the adoption of a mail order service and change in the reimbursement rates of a pharmacy service plan for state and public school employees did not constitute “rule-making” within the meaning of subsections (8) and (9) of this section, and accordingly, the notice and hearing provisions therein did not have to be complied with; such recommendations were within the board's legislatively mandated duties pursuant to §21-5-401. Arkansas Pharmacist's Ass'n v. Arkansas State & Pub. Sch. Life and Hlth. Ins. Bd., 352 Ark. 1, 98 S.W.3d 27 (2003).

Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act (APA) did not apply to statewide ban on solicitation activity at State revenue offices, as the policy did not meet the APA's definition of a “rule” because it simply prohibited those who did not have business with the State from soliciting on revenue office property.Brown v. Ark. Dep't of Fin. & Admin., 180 F. Supp. 3d 602 (W.D. Ark. 2016), aff'd, 674 Fed. Appx. 599 (8th Cir. 2017).

Cited: Fireman's Ins. Co. v. Ark. State Claims Comm'n, 301 Ark. 451, 784 S.W.2d 771; National Park Medical Ctr. v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 322 Ark. 595, 911 S.W.2d 250 (1995); Beavers v. Ark. State Bd. of Dental Exam'rs, 151 F.3d 838 (8th Cir. 1998); Ark. Dep't of Econ. Dev. v. William J. Clinton Presidential Found., 364 Ark. 40, 216 S.W.3d 119 (2005); Munson v. Ark. Dep't of Corr. Sex Offender Screening, 369 Ark. 290, 253 S.W.3d 901 (2007); Walker v. Ark. State Bd. of Educ., 2010 Ark. 277, 365 S.W.3d 899 (2010).

Adopt as a rule a description of its organization, stating the general course and method of its operations, including the methods whereby the public may obtain information or make submissions or requests;

Adopt rules of practice setting forth the nature and requirements of all formal and informal procedures available, including a description of all forms and instructions used by the agency;

Make available for public inspection all rules and all other written statements of policy or interpretations formulated, adopted, or used by the agency in the discharge of its functions; and

Make available for public inspection all orders, decisions, and opinions.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (c).

Ark. L. Notes.

Driver, The Arkansas Register: Worth Doing Right? The Case for Codification of Arkansas Regulatory Law, 1992 Ark. L. Notes 99.

Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act (APA) did not apply to statewide ban on solicitation activity at State revenue offices, as the policy did not meet the APA's definition of a “rule” because it simply prohibited those who did not have business with the State from soliciting on revenue office property.Brown v. Ark. Dep't of Fin. & Admin., 180 F. Supp. 3d 602 (W.D. Ark. 2016), aff'd, 674 Fed. Appx. 599 (8th Cir. 2017).

The plaintiff was not deprived of due process by the department's failure to promulgate rules and regulations for its administrative hearing procedures as required by the statute where she had considerable opportunity for discovery and did not say that she asked the hearing officer for more. Alexander v. Pathfinder, Inc., 189 F.3d 735 (8th Cir. 1999).

Cited: Parker v. Corrothers, 750 F.2d 653 (8th Cir. 1984).

The notice shall include:

A statement of the terms or substance of the intended action or a description of the subjects and issues involved; and

The time, location, and manner in which an interested person may present his or her position on the intended action of the agency or on the issues related to the intended action of the agency.

The notice shall be mailed to:

A person specified by law; and

A person who has requested advance notice of rulemaking proceedings.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the notice shall be published:

In a newspaper of general daily circulation for three (3) consecutive days and, when appropriate, in those trade, industry, or professional publications that the agency may select.

By the Secretary of State on the internet for thirty (30) days under § 25-15-218.

If enacted legislation requires or results in more than one (1) agency adopting, amending, or repealing rules on a similar subject matter, the agencies may publish a combined notice for all rules.

The combined notice shall:

Include:

Meet the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)(C) and (D) of this section;

The agency shall grant an opportunity for an oral hearing if requested by twenty-five (25) persons, by a governmental subdivision or agency, or by an association having at least twenty-five (25) members.

The agency shall fully consider all written and oral submissions respecting the proposed rule before finalizing the language of the proposed rule and filing the proposed rule as required by subsection (e) of this section.

If an interested person requests a statement of the reasons for and against the adoption of a rule before adoption or within thirty (30) days after adoption, the agency shall issue a concise statement of the principal reasons for and against its adoption, incorporating its reasons for overruling the considerations urged against its adoption.

When rules are required by law to be made on the record after opportunity for an agency hearing, the provisions of that law shall apply in place of this subdivision (a)(2).

Agencies that publish a combined notice as described in subdivision (a)(1)(E) of this section may hold a joint public hearing when required by law or otherwise desired by the agencies; and

Consider the following factors:

Whether the agency is required by statute to adopt the proposed rule, whether by a specific date, and whether the agency has discretion to promulgate rules;

Other statutes relevant to the proposed rule and its alternatives;

The specific nature and significance of the problem the agency addresses with the proposed rule, including without limitation:

The nature and degree of the risks the problem poses;

The priority of addressing those risks as opposed to other matters or activities within the agency's jurisdiction;

Whether the problem warrants new agency action; and

The countervailing risks that may be posed by alternative rules for the agency;

Whether existing rules have created or contributed to the problem the agency is addressing with the proposed rule, and whether those rules could be amended or repealed to address the problem in whole or in part;

Reasonable alternatives to the proposed rule, including without limitation:

Adopting no rule;

Amending or repealing existing rules; and

Other potential responses that could be taken instead of agency action;

The financial impact of the proposed rule; and

Any other factor relevant to the need for and alternatives to the proposed rule.

(1)An agency shall not adopt, amend, or repeal a rule unless the rule is based on the best reasonably obtainable scientific, technical, economic, or other evidence and information available concerning the need for, consequences of, and alternatives to the rule.

The additional benefits of the more costly rule justify its additional cost;

The agency explains its reason for adoption of the more costly rule in writing;

The reason is based on the interests of public health, safety, or welfare; and

The reason is within the scope of the agency's statutory authority.

(1)If an agency finds that imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare or compliance with a federal law or regulation requires adoption of a rule upon less than thirty (30) days' notice and states in writing its reasons for that finding, it may proceed without prior notice or hearing, or upon any abbreviated notice and hearing that it may choose, to adopt an emergency rule.

(1)A person may petition an agency for the issuance, amendment, or repeal of a rule.

Deny the petition, stating in writing its reasons for the denial; or

Initiate rulemaking proceedings.

(1)(A)An agency shall file with the Secretary of State and the Legislative Council a:

Copy of each rule, including without limitation an emergency rule, proposed by the agency;

Financial impact statement for the proposed rule;

Notice for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule required to be published on the internet under this section;

Statement setting forth the reason for the proposed rule; and

Summary of the proposed rule.

An agency shall file with the Arkansas State Library a copy of each rule, including without limitation an emergency rule, finalized by the agency and a financial impact statement for the rule.

A rule shall be filed in compliance with this section and with §§ 10-3-309 and 25-15-218.

The Secretary of State shall keep a register of the rules open to public inspection, and it shall be a permanent register.

If the purpose of a state agency rule is to implement a federal rule or regulation, the financial impact statement shall include:

The cost to implement the federal rule or regulation; and

The additional cost of the state rule.

(A)If a financial impact statement reveals a new or increased cost or obligation of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year to a private individual, private entity, private business, state government, county government, municipal government, or to two (2) or more of those entities combined, the agency shall file written findings at the time of filing the financial impact statement.

The written findings shall be filed simultaneously with the financial impact statement and shall include without limitation:

A statement of the rule's basis and purpose;

The problem the agency seeks to address with the proposed rule, including a statement of whether a rule is required by statute;

A description of the factual evidence that:

Justifies the agency's need for the proposed rule; and

Describes how the benefits of the rule meet the relevant statutory objectives and justify the rule's costs;

A list of less costly alternatives to the proposed rule and the reasons why the alternatives do not adequately address the problem to be solved by the proposed rule;

A list of alternatives to the proposed rule that were suggested as a result of public comment and the reasons why the alternatives do not adequately address the problem to be solved by the proposed rule;

(a)A statement of whether existing rules have created or contributed to the problem the agency seeks to address with the proposed rule.

If existing rules have created or contributed to the problem, an explanation of why amendment or repeal of the rule creating or contributing to the problem is not a sufficient response; and

An agency plan for review of the rule no less than every ten (10) years to determine whether, based upon the evidence, there remains a need for the rule, including without limitation whether:

The rule is achieving the statutory objectives;

The benefits of the rule continue to justify its costs; and

The rule can be amended or repealed to reduce costs while continuing to achieve the statutory objections.

An agency shall not file a final rule with the Secretary of State for adoption unless the final rule has been approved under § 10-3-309.

Each rule adopted by an agency is effective ten (10) days after filing of the final rule with the Secretary of State unless a later date is specified by law or in the rule itself.

A final rule shall not be filed until the thirty-day public comment period required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section has expired.

After the expiration of the thirty-day public comment period and before the effective date of the rule, the agency promulgating the rule shall take appropriate measures to make the final rule known to the persons who may be affected by the rule.

Appropriate measures shall include without limitation posting the following information on the agency's website:

The final rule;

Copies of all written comments submitted to the agency regarding the rule;

A summary of all written and oral comments submitted to the agency regarding the rule and the agency's response to those comments;

A summary of the financial impact of the rule; and

The proposed effective date of the final rule.

However, an emergency rule may become effective immediately upon filing or at a stated time less than ten (10) days after filing if the agency finds that this effective date is necessary because of imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare.

The agency's finding, a brief statement of the reasons for the finding, and the financial impact statement shall be filed with the rule.

The agency shall take appropriate measures to make emergency rules known to the persons who may be affected by the emergency rules.

A rule adopted after June 30, 1967, is not valid unless adopted and filed in substantial compliance with this section.

In a proceeding that questions the existence of imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare, a written finding by an agency that adopting an emergency rule was necessary to avoid the loss of federal funding or certification establishes a prima facie case of the existence of imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare.

The burden of proof shifts to the challenger to rebut the existence of the condition by a preponderance of the evidence.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 1995, Nos. 884 and 1104. Subsection (d) of this section was also amended by Acts 1995, No. 459 to read as follows:

“(d)(1)Every agency, including those exempted under §25-15-202, shall file with the Secretary of State, the Arkansas State Library, and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission a certified copy of each rule and regulation adopted by it.

“(2)The Secretary of State shall keep a register of the rules open to public inspection, and it shall be a permanent register.

“(3)The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall publish a code of state regulations pursuant to §1-2-301 et seq.”

Acts 2015, No. 1258, § 1, provided: “LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The General Assembly finds:

“(1)Amendment 92 to the Arkansas Constitution states in part: ‘The General Assembly may provide by law for the review by a legislative committee of administrative rules promulgated by a state agency before the administrative rules become effective; and that administrative rules promulgated by a state agency shall not become effective until reviewed and approved by the legislative committee charged by law with the review of administrative rules under subdivision (a)(1) of this section’;

“(2)As Amendment 92 does not define the term ‘state agency’, the General Assembly may establish a definition by law as part of its implementation of Amendment 92;

“(3)The General Assembly at this time wishes to exclude the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education from the definition of ‘state agency’ applied to the implementation of Amendment 92; and

“(4)The General Assembly or the Legislative Council reserve the right to amend the definition of ‘state agency’ in the future to include one (1) or all of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education.”

Acts 2019, No. 319, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Red Tape Reduction Collective Rulemaking Act of 2019’”.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment by No. 587 added “Except as provided in §5-64-201” at the beginning of (b)(2).

The 2011 amendment by No. 1015 added the (e)(1)(A) designation; in (e)(1)(A), substituted “thirty (30)” for “ten (10)” and inserted “of the final rule”; added (e)(1)(B) and (C); and substituted “thirty (30)” for “ten (10)” in (e)(2)(A)(i).

The 2011 amendment by No. 1016 added (b)(3).

The 2013 amendment by No. 759 rewrote (a)(3); inserted (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote (e)(3); added (e)(4); and, in (f) added “A summary of the financial impact of the rule” and “and the financial impact statement.”

The 2013 amendment by No. 1057 inserted “with the Secretary of State” in (f)(1)(A).

The 2015 amendment inserted (c)(2), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “§5-64-201” for “§5-64-204” in (c)(3); in (e)(1)(A), substituted “Legislative Council” for “Bureau of Legislative Research” and inserted “including without limitation an emergency rule”; inserted (f), and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and substituted “ten (10) days” for “thirty (30) days” in present (g)(1)(A) and present (g)(2)(A)(i).

The 2017 amendment, in (e)(1)(A), deleted “the Arkansas State Library” following “State” and substituted “the agency” for “it”; inserted (e)(1)(B); and redesignated former (e)(1)(B) as (e)(1)(C).

The 2019 amendment by No. 319 added (a)(1)(E) and (a)(2)(F).

The 2019 amendment by No. 662 added the (e)(1)(A)(i) and (e)(1)(A)(ii) designations; and added (e)(1)(A)(iii) through (e)(1)(A)(v).

Ark. L. Notes.

Driver, The Arkansas Register: Worth Doing Right? The Case for Codification of Arkansas Regulatory Law, 1992 Ark. L. Notes 99.

The Employment Security Division of the Arkansas Department of Labor (now Arkansas Employment Security Department) is specifically exempted but neither the Department of Labor nor the Commissioner of Labor (now Director of the Arkansas Employment Security Department) are exempt from provisions of this subchapter relating to the procedure for the adoption of rules. Arkansas Dep't of Labor v. American Emp. Agency, 257 Ark. 509, 517 S.W.2d 949 (1975).

Arkansas Health Services Commission's new rule allowing the Commission to disregard the overall county occupancy one time in order to approve a 70-bed nursing home facility in a single county where the projected need for the county exceeded the “existing” beds by 250 or more beds was not arbitrary special or local legislation, because it was conceivable that other counties in the state would, in the future, come under the rule's provisions. Ark. Health Servs. Comm'n v. Reg'l Care Facilities, Inc., 351 Ark. 331, 93 S.W.3d 672 (2002).

Circuit court did not err in granting beneficiaries of a state Medicaid program a temporary restraining order enjoining the Department of Human Services from conducting annual reassessments and reducing attendant-care hours as the beneficiaries demonstrated a likelihood of success on the merits; the beneficiaries showed that the Department of Human Services did not substantially comply with this section in promulgating the new Resource Utilization Groups system methodology by failing to provide proper notice.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Ledgerwood, 2017 Ark. 308, 530 S.W.3d 336 (2017).

Department of Human Services (DHS) did not violate the express terms of a preliminary injunction order and was not in contempt where the order expressly barred it from using a Medicaid waiver methodology “unless or until it was properly promulgated” and days later DHS promulgated an emergency rule utilizing the same methodology without prior notice and opportunity for public comment. DHS complied with subsection (c) of this section when adopting the emergency rule by providing a written statement explaining its finding of imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare absent the emergency rule.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Ledgerwood, 2019 Ark. 121, 571 S.W.3d 911 (2019).

As the Department of Human Services had the ability to modify the proposed rules, which plaintiff health care provider contended were fixed by contract prior to the expiration of the public comment period, the rule making was not in violation of this section. National Park Medical Ctr. v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 322 Ark. 595, 911 S.W.2d 250 (1995).

Cited: Curry v. State, 279 Ark. 153, 649 S.W.2d 833 (1983); Parker v. Corrothers, 750 F.2d 653 (8th Cir. 1984); Muhammed v. Arkansas Supreme Court Comm. on Professional Conduct, 291 Ark. 29, 722 S.W.2d 280 (1987); Eldridge v. Board of Corr., 298 Ark. 467, 768 S.W.2d 534 (1989).

A copy of each rule, including without limitation an emergency rule, proposed by an agency;

A financial impact statement for the proposed rule;

The notice for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule required to be published on the internet under § 25-15-204;

A statement setting forth the reason for the proposed rule; and

A summary of the proposed rule.

The inclusion of a direct link to an electronic version of the information under subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall satisfy the requirements of this section.

The Secretary of State may omit from publication in the register any rule in which publication would be unduly cumbersome, expensive, or otherwise impractical.

If a rule is omitted from publication under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section, the register shall indicate where and how a copy of the omitted rule may be obtained.

The Secretary of State shall update the register at least monthly no later than the first Tuesday of every month, setting forth a synopsis of rules filed by agencies.

(1)If requested, a printed copy of the register shall be furnished to all state agencies and other persons at prices fixed by the Secretary of State to cover publication and mailing costs.

A progress report on publication and distribution shall be provided to the Legislative Council annually.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (a); in (b), substituted “update” for “publish” and deleted the former last sentence, which read “A cumulative index shall be published annually”; and added “If requested, a printed copy of” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a)(2); added (a)(3) and (4); and inserted “no later than the first Tuesday of every month” in (b).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Heller and Sallings, Survey of Public Law, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 296.

“Rulemaking” means an agency process for the formulation, amendment, or repeal of a rule.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 1; 1971, No. 316, § 1; 1977, No. 349, § 1; 1979, No. 324, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-701, 5-701.1; Acts 1997, No. 1149, § 1; 1999, No. 1222, § 17; 2001, No. 1648, § 1; 2003, No. 350, § 1; 2013, No. 759, § 3; 2017, No. 605, § 2; 2019, No. 517, § 1; 2019, No. 662, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 620, 621.

25-15-203. Rules — Required rules — Public inspection.

In addition to other rulemaking requirements imposed by law, each agency shall:

No agency rule, order, or decision shall be valid or effective against any person or party, nor may it be invoked by the agency for any purpose, until it has been filed and made available for public inspection as required in this subchapter. This provision shall not apply in favor of any person or party with actual knowledge of an agency rule, order, or decision.

To the extent possible, a rule shall be written in plain language.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-702; Acts 1993, No. 1106, § 2; 2001, No. 1648, § 2; 2019, No. 662, § 1.

25-15-204. Rules — Procedure for adoption.

Prior to the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule, the agency shall:

(A)(i)Give at least thirty (30) days' notice of its intended action.

The thirty-day period shall begin on the first day of the publication of notice.

The names of all agencies involved in the collective filing; and

The time, location, and manner in which an interested person may present his or her position on the intended action of each agency or on the issues related to the intended action of each agency; and

(A)Afford all interested persons reasonable opportunity to submit written data, views, or arguments, orally or in writing.

An agency shall adopt the least costly rule considered under this section, unless:

An agency shall not file an emergency rule with the Secretary of State for adoption until the emergency rule has been approved under §10-3-309.

Except as provided in §5-64-201, the rule may be effective for no longer than one hundred twenty (120) days.

If, after the expiration of the effective period of an emergency rule, an agency wishes to adopt a successive emergency rule that is identical or substantially similar to the expired emergency rule, the agency shall not adopt the successive emergency rule earlier than thirty (30) days after the expiration of the emergency rule.

Within thirty (30) days after submission of a petition, the agency shall:

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 3; 1979, No. 62, § 1; 1985, No. 139, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-703; Acts 1989, No. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1993, No. 1106, § 1; 1995, No. 459, § 3; 1995, No. 884, §§ 1-3; 1995, No. 1104, § 1; 1997, No. 406, § 1; 1997, No. 533, § 4; 2001, No. 1648, § 3; 2003, No. 1478, § 1; 2005, No. 1259, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 3; 2007, No. 143, § 2; 2011, No. 587, § 2; 2011, No. 1015, § 1; 2011, No. 1016, § 1; 2013, No. 759, § 4; 2013, No. 1057, § 1; 2015, No. 1258, § 40; 2017, No. 1079, § 1;
2019, No. 319, §§ 4, 5; 2019, No. 662, § 2.

25-15-205. Rules — The Arkansas Register.

(1)The Secretary of State shall compile, index, and publish on its website a document to be known as “The Arkansas Register”.

The register shall contain:

Proceeds from the sale of the register shall be deposited into the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund in the State Treasury.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § [17], as added by Acts 1979, No. 818, § 1; 1977, No. 720, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-704.1, 5-704.2; Acts 1991, No. 1075, § 14; 2001, No. 1648, § 4; 2003, No. 1478, § 2; 2013, No. 1057, § 2; 2019, No. 662, § 3.

25-15-206. Rules — Declaratory orders.

Each agency shall provide by rule for the filing and prompt disposition of petitions for declaratory orders as to the applicability of any rule, statute, or order enforced by it. These declaratory orders shall have the same status as agency orders in cases of adjudication.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-706.